New York, session 2025-2026, S6170.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The general municipal law is amended by adding a new 2 section 99-aa to read as follows: 3 § 99-aa. Requirements for resettling, transporting or relocating 4 certain migrants to other municipalities. 1. Any municipal corporation 5 resettling, transporting or relocating non-detained migrants to another 6 municipal corporation within the state, which is directed, administered, 7 or funded by the federal government, the secretary of health and human 8 services in the case of minors, the secretary of homeland security in 9 the case of adults, or any municipal corporation within the state or 10 agents thereof, shall not later than thirty days before such resettle- 11 ment, transportation, or relocation consult with both the governor and 12 the chief executive officer of the directly affected municipal corpo- 13 ration regarding the proposed resettlement, transportation or relo- 14 cation. 15 2. (a) Not later than seven days after the effective date of this 16 section, and monthly thereafter, the chief executive officer of the 17 municipal corporation that is funding or directing the relocation of 18 non-detained migrants shall make a state-specific report regarding the 19 resettlement, transportation or relocation of such non-detained migrants 20 in the United States during the previous month that was directed, admin- 21 istered, or funded by the federal government or the municipal corpo- 22 ration or that involved noncitizens subject to the United States immi- 23 gration and customs enforcement's alternatives to detention program. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD06676-01-5 S. 6170 2 1 Such report shall be provided to the governor and the chief executive 2 officer of every municipal corporation within the state that migrants 3 are being transported to. Additionally such report shall be made avail- 4 able on a publicly accessible government website for the municipal 5 corporation making the report. 6 (b) Each report shall contain: 7 (i) the total number of migrants resettled, transported or relocated 8 during the previous month and the current calendar year, disaggregated 9 by: 10 (A) the numbers of single adults, members of family units, and minors; 11 (B) age; 12 (C) sex; and 13 (D) country of origin; 14 (ii) the methods used to determine the ages of such migrants; 15 (iii) the methods used to verify the familial status of such migrants; 16 (iv) the types of settings in which such migrants are being resettled, 17 transported or relocated, which may be aggregated by the general type of 18 setting; 19 (v) summary of the educational or occupational resources or assistance 20 provided to such migrants; 21 (vi) whether such migrants are granted permits to work and how any 22 such migrants without a work permit will financially support themselves; 23 (vii) the total amounts the municipal corporation has spent on migrant 24 resettlement, transportation or relocation; 25 (viii) whether the migrants are being resettled, transported or relo- 26 cated on a temporary or permanent basis, disaggregated by: 27 (A) the numbers of single adults, members of family units, and minors; 28 (B) age; 29 (C) sex; and 30 (D) country of origin; and 31 (ix) the types of security screenings performed with respect to such 32 migrants. 33 § 2. This act shall take effect on the thirtieth day after it shall 34 have become a law.